Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 15 Primary Elections

17-15-1.
Date of primaries.

A primary election for the nomination of candidates for each political party shall be held in each voting district in the manner provided in this chapter on the eighth Tuesday preceding biennial state elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 245, § 2.

17-15-2.
Regular primary date falling on religious holiday.

In the event that the date for the holding of any primary election preceding any general state or municipal election as provided in this chapter falls upon the day of a religious holiday, the primary shall be held upon the next business day, other than Saturday, then following; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to invalidate a primary election once held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1955, ch. 3581, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 200, § 1.

17-15-3.
Special election primaries.

Party primary elections shall also be held for the purpose of nominating candidates for an office or offices to be elected at any special election. In the event of a special election, the state board shall fix the date or dates on which the various party primary elections shall be held; provided, that all the party primary elections shall have been held by the thirtieth (30th) day preceding the date fixed for the special election; and provided, further, that the date or dates fixed by the state board shall not be a religious holiday and shall be held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 200, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 6.

17-15-4.
Municipal primaries other than at time of general primaries.

In those cities and towns that now by law hold elections for city or town officers on a day other than the Tuesday after the first Monday in November biennially in each even year, a primary election for the nomination of the city or town officials shall be held and the local board shall fix the date of the election; provided, that the primary election shall have been held by the thirtieth (30th) day preceding the date fixed for the election; and provided, further, that the date fixed by the local board shall not be a religious holiday and shall be held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 1967, ch. 200, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 6; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 6.

17-15-5.
Combination of voting districts.

Local boards shall have the power to combine two (2) or more voting districts within the same ward, and senatorial or representative district and the combined district shall be treated as a voting district, but only upon the approval of the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11; P.L. 1990, ch. 151, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 187, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 352, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 79, § 2.

17-15-6.
Conventions and caucuses replaced — Parties holding primaries — Forms.

The primary elections held pursuant to this chapter shall replace the party conventions and caucuses for making the nominations provided for in this title, but party conventions shall be held for the purposes that are authorized by §

17-12-13

. Primaries shall be held only by political parties. Except as otherwise provided in this title, any and all forms prescribed by this chapter shall be prepared and provided by the secretary of state and shall be, wherever practicable, uniform throughout the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-7.
Candidates nominated at primaries.

At the primary elections, candidates shall be nominated for the following offices, if the offices are to be filled at the succeeding election:

Senators in the congress of the United States.

Representatives in the congress of the United States.

General officers of the state.

Senators in the general assembly from the respective senatorial districts.

Representatives in the general assembly from the respective representative districts.

Mayors for the respective cities.

Members of the city or town councils from the respective towns, wards, and districts.

All other city or town officials previously nominated by party caucus, convention, or party committees, whose offices are to be filled at the regular or special election next succeeding the primary, with the exception of candidates for presidential elector who shall be selected as provided in this title.

At the primary elections the members of ward, town, and district committees of the respective political parties shall be elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 3; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11.

17-15-8.
Listing of candidates on ballots.

The secretary of state shall immediately, upon receipt of the certificates provided for by chapter 14 of this title, cause the proper ballots to be prepared for use in the various voting districts. Names of party candidates for a particular office shall be printed vertically below the names of the office they seek and shall not appear on the ballot more than once for the same office; provided, the names of candidates having the endorsement of their party committees shall be printed first below the title of the offices they seek and shall be marked with an asterisk (*). As to each candidate, following the endorsed party candidate, for a national office, a general office within the state, or for a general assembly office, the names shall be listed in an order chosen by lot under the direction of the secretary of state. As to each candidate, following the endorsed party candidate, for a city, town, or other local election, the names shall be listed alphabetically after the name of the endorsed party candidate. In the event that there are more candidates for a particular office than the voting machine can accommodate in the vertical column, the names shall be continued in the same manner in the next succeeding vertical column. Names of candidates shall be printed upon the ballots as the names appear on the voting list, notwithstanding that the candidate may have signed his or her declaration of candidacy other than as the candidate’s name appears on the voting list.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 15; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 389, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 1996 ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-9.
Slate voting.

In a primary election no ballot shall be provided whereby a voter may by one mark vote for a slate of candidates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 15, as enacted by P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 15; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 11; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11; P.L. 1985, ch. 141, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 16; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 16, effective January 1, 1997.

17-15-11.
Dispensation with primary when no contest.

Whenever there is no contest within any voting district for the officers to be nominated or elected by a particular political party for any election, no primary election shall be held in that voting district and the secretary of state for state offices or the local boards for local offices shall declare those persons elected in the case of party committee members or delegates or nominated as candidates of a particular party for the office, and their names shall not be printed on the primary ballot but shall be printed on the ballot for the election for which the nominations are made; provided, that the party committee members’ names and the names of the delegates to the state convention of the respective party shall not be put on the election ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 17; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 12; P.L. 1951, ch. 2731, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-12.
Ballot when contest exists.

Whenever there is a contest within any voting district, a primary election shall be held in the voting district and the names of all candidates for state office and the names of only those candidates for local office that are contesting a particular local office or offices shall appear on the ballots.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 17; P.L. 1951, ch. 2731, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3202, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-13.
Voting places — Primary officials — Party officials — Appointment.

From lists submitted to it by the chairperson of the state committees of each party, the board shall appoint and issue commissions to a sufficient number of qualified electors of this state to be primary inspectors so that one inspector may be assigned for each party to each primary polling place to work with the other primary officials of his or her party. The local board shall, at least fifty (50) days prior to the primary, select the place or places designated by it for holding the primary election provided for by this chapter. The local board shall, at least thirty-five (35) days before any primary election, appoint for each polling place within its city or town a primary warden or moderator and a primary clerk in the following manner:

If there are primary contests in both major political parties, the warden and clerk shall be appointed as provided in §

17-11-11

;

If there is a primary contest in only one of the major political parties, the warden and the clerk shall be selected from a list submitted by the local committee of the party in which the contest exists.

The local board shall also appoint at least thirty-five days (35) before any primary election, from lists submitted at least forty-five (45) days prior to the date set for the holding of the primaries, four (4) supervisors, in the following manner: (1) if there are primary contests in both major political parties, one supervisor shall be appointed for each party in the manner provided in §

17-11-11

and two (2) supervisors, one for each party, shall be appointed from lists submitted by a majority of the respective party candidates, other than those endorsed by the party committee; (2) if there is no primary contest in one of the major political parties, two (2) supervisors shall be appointed from a list submitted by the local committee in which the contest exists, and two (2) supervisors shall be appointed from a list or lists submitted by a majority of the party candidates, other than those endorsed by the party committee. The local board may appoint any additional pairs of supervisors that it may deem necessary in the same manner provided in this subsection and shall do so when directed by the state board.

The local board shall also appoint for each party one watcher, two (2) checkers, and the number of runners, not to exceed three (3), that the appropriate party chairperson may deem necessary, which watcher, checkers, and runners shall be designated as party officials. These party officials shall be appointed from lists of qualified electors who are qualified to vote at the respective party primaries which lists shall be furnished as provided in subsection (b) of this section to the local board at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for the holding of the primary. If the party candidates or a majority of them, other than those endorsed by the party committee, notify the local board in writing of their choices at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for the holding of the primaries, the local board shall likewise appoint one watcher, two (2) checkers, and the number of runners that it shall have appointed at the request of the party chairperson, to act for them collectively. The local board shall give them certificates as party officials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 19; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3202, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 2.

17-15-14.
Qualifications of primary officials — Affidavit.

Each warden or moderator and each primary supervisor appointed under the provisions of §§

17-15-13

and

17-15-16

shall be able to read the Constitution of the state in the English language, and to write his or her name, and shall, whenever possible, be a voter of the senatorial district, representative district, or town, ward, or voting district from which he or she is appointed.

No person shall be appointed to serve as a primary official who has been convicted, found guilty, pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, or placed on a deferred or suspended sentence or on probation for any crime that involved moral turpitude or a violation of any of the election, caucus, or primary laws of this or any other state.

No person serving as a primary official may serve in such capacity in the city or town in which they are a municipal employee.

No person who is seeking nomination or election at any primary election shall act as a primary official at that primary.

Every primary official shall make an affidavit before the proper local board or some member of the board to the effect that the official is not disqualified by reason of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 19; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 21, § 1.

17-15-15.
Powers and duties of primary officials — Compensation.

Primary wardens, moderators, clerks, and supervisors shall have the same powers and duties in the conduct of primary elections as are conferred and imposed by law upon general election officials, and they shall receive the same compensation as general election officials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 19; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-16.
Vacancies among primary officials.

Vacancies occurring among primary officials shall be immediately filled by the local boards in the same manner as provided for general elections as qualified by §

17-15-13

; provided, that in the event there are no lists available, the local board shall appoint some person or persons to fill the vacancy from the list of registered voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 19; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 480, § 2.

17-15-17.
Notice of primaries.

At least eight (8) days before the time of holding any primary election, the local board shall cause notice of the primary to be posted in at least one public place in each voting district of any city, and in at least one public place in each voting district of a town. The notice shall state the time when, and the place where, the primary is to be held in each city, town or voting district, and the offices for which candidates are to be nominated; provided, that the local boards may, at their discretion, substitute notification by publication in a newspaper having local circulation for notification by posting in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 20; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-17

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-18.
Apportionment of voting booths and optical scan precinct count units.

The apportionment of voting booths for the primary election of each political party shall, as far as possible, be on the same basis as for general elections, except that the determination shall be made with reference to the average number of votes received by the candidates of each party at the preceding general election.

Unless otherwise prescribed by the board of elections, one optical scan precinct count unit shall be programmed and provided for each voting district. In no event shall there be less than one optical scan precinct count unit for each voting district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 21; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-18

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-19.
Arrangement and paraphernalia at voting places.

The primary election voting places shall be equipped by the local boards with the paraphernalia necessary for conducting elections and, except as otherwise specifically provided in chapters 12 — 15 of this title, the voting places shall be arranged wherever practicable in the manner provided in chapter 19 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 22; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-19

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-20.
Primaries conducted in same manner as general elections.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, primary elections shall be conducted as nearly as may be in the manner provided in chapter 19 of this title for the conducting of general elections, except that the voting in each party shall be cast on separate computer ballots.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-20

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-20.1.
City of East Providence — 2002 Primary Elections.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the procedure for the primary elections in the city of East Providence in the calendar year 2002 shall be conducted as follows:

On September 10, 2002, there shall be a primary election in the city of East Providence to nominate such candidates for the East Providence city council and East Providence school committee.

Candidates for nomination in this primary election shall file with the canvassing authority declarations of their candidacy upon forms provided by the canvassing authority. Said The declaration shall be filed on the 10th, 11th and not later than 4:00 p.m. on the 12th day of June, 2002.

The canvassing authority shall prepare nomination papers for circulation and distribute those papers to the declared candidates on the 13th day of June, 2002 and not later than 4:00 p.m. on the 14th day of June, 2002.

Nomination papers must be assembled and united into one instrument and filed with the canvassing authority by the candidates in the primary election not later than 4:00 p.m. on the 5th day of July, 2002.

No nomination shall be valid unless the candidate shall file with the canvassing authority in writing no later than 4:00 p.m. on the 19th day of July, 2002 his or her consent accepting the nomination, agreeing not to withdraw, and if nominated, to qualify as a candidate in the general city election.

The canvassing authority shall check the signatures on the nomination petitions filed with it and shall certify those candidates who have the required number of signatures as candidates in the primary election not later than 4:00 p.m. on the 12th day of July, 2002.

All subsequent primary elections in the city of East Providence shall be held in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 97, § 1.

17-15-21.
Identification of party voters.

Before permitting any person to vote in a primary election, the warden or clerk and bipartisan pair of supervisors assigned by the warden shall ascertain from the voting record appearing on the certified voting list that the voter is not disqualified to vote by the provisions of §

17-15-24

. The bipartisan pair of supervisors shall provide the voter with the corresponding computer ballot for the primary election in which the voter is eligible and desiring to vote. The warden shall take any steps that may be necessary to assure that each voter is given the computer ballot upon which the voter is eligible to vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10; P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 1.

17-15-22.
Party checkers, runners and watchers.

The local board shall, by written rule, provide for the presence of party checkers to be seated outside the rail next to the warden to make a list of those who vote and for the distribution of lists or memoranda to the proper representatives or candidates or groups of candidates. Party checkers, runners and watchers shall be regulated in the same manner as directed in §

17-19-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-22

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 400, § 1.

17-15-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-25

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-23

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 2, effective July 4, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 2, effective July 7, 2006.

17-15-24.
Disqualification by activity in other party.

No person shall be entitled to vote in the primary election of any political party who has voted in a primary election as a member of any other political party and has not changed his or her party designation as provided in chapter 9.1 of this title or has designated his or her affiliation with any other political party, as set forth in chapter 9.1 of this title. No person shall be debarred from voting in a party primary solely because of that person’s signing of nomination papers of a candidate to be voted for at any primary. A person having designated his or her party affiliation as set forth in chapter 9.1 of this title shall be deemed to have taken part in the primary as a member of that political party, and shall be debarred from voting in the primary as a member of the opposite political party until that person has changed his or her party affiliation as provided in chapter 9.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-26

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-24

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 107, § 3.

17-15-25.
Nomination papers for delegates to constitutional conventions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, every qualified elector shall be eligible to sign nomination papers for candidates for delegates to any constitutional convention. The signing of nomination papers for candidates for delegates to any constitutional convention shall not affect the rights of qualified electors under the provisions of this chapter, or any other general or public law affecting the qualification of voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2807, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-27

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-25

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-26.
Challenge of identity as to right to vote.

Whenever the identity of any person offering to vote is challenged at the polling place, that person shall be permitted to vote only by using a provisional ballot as defined in §

17-19-24.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-28

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-26

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 1.

17-15-27.
Impartiality of officials — Sound equipment.

The primary officials shall treat all candidates with absolute impartiality. No sound equipment advocating the election or defeat of any candidate or the approval or disapproval of any referenda shall be allowed within five hundred (500) feet of any polling place.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-30

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-27

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 200, § 1.

17-15-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 24; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-31

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-28

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 342, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 7, 2007.

17-15-29.
Number of votes required to nominate or elect.

In determining the nomination or election of a candidate at a primary election, the person receiving the largest number of votes, although less than a majority of all the votes cast for the candidates for a particular office, shall be declared nominated or elected. Where there is more than one person to be elected to a particular office or place, those persons equaling that number of officers to be elected to the office or place receiving the largest number of votes, although less than a majority of all the votes cast for all the candidates for the office or place, shall be declared nominated or elected, as the case may be, unless otherwise provided by existing law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 25; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1050, ch. 2476, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-35

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-29

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-30.
Tabulation of local returns — Certificate of nomination or election.

The local board shall meet on the day following the primary election and shall tabulate the city or town primary returns, as the case may be, and announce the results, but shall issue no certificates of nomination or election to party office until the expiration of the period in which a recount may be requested as provided in §

17-15-34

, and if a request has been filed, the result shall be finally determined by the local board. Following the expiration of this period and the final determination by the local board, if any request for a recount is made, the local board shall issue certificates of nomination or election to party offices to the candidates so nominated or elected.

When a local election is held in conjunction with a statewide election, the state board shall tabulate local mail ballots and immediately forward the results to the appropriate local board; when a local election is not held in conjunction with a statewide election, the local board shall tabulate their local mail ballots.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 25; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-36

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-30

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-31.
Tabulation of state returns — Certificates of nomination or election.

The state board shall proceed to tabulate the state primary returns and announce the results, but shall issue no certificates of nomination until the expiration of the period in which a recount may be requested as provided in §

17-15-34

has expired and, if a request has been filed, until the result has been finally determined by the state board. Following the expiration of this period and the final determination by the state board, if any request for a recount is made, the board shall issue certificates of nomination or election to the candidates so nominated or elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 25; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-37

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-31

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-32.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 25; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-38

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-32

; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 45, effective April 14, 2004.

17-15-33.
Tie vote.

If there is a failure to make a nomination or to elect a candidate to party office at any primary by reason of a tie vote, the vacancy, if in respect to an office to be filled by the voters of more than one city or town, shall be filled by the executive committee of the state committee of the respective party, except in the case of a senatorial or representative committee the vacancy shall be filled by the members of the senatorial or representative district committee, as the case may be, and if in respect to an office other than a senatorial or representative district committee to be filled by the voters of no more than one city or town, or a portion of a city or town, the vacancy shall be filled by the city or town committee of the respective political party. The vacancy shall be filled only by the choice of one of the candidates receiving the tie vote. The name of the candidate chosen by the appropriate party committee shall be officially certified to the state board or local board, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 26; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-39

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-33

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 11.

17-15-34.
Recount petition or other protest.

Any candidate whose name was on the primary ballot may file with the state board a request for the recounting of the votes cast, or other protest concerning the primary, provided he or she files the request or protest no later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the day following the primary. The request or protest shall contain the candidate’s reason for making the request or protest. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the state board, acting on its own motion, from ordering a recount or taking appropriate action in response to any error, irregularity, or impropriety in the conduct of any facet of the primary which comes to its attention at any time prior to the certification of the results of the primary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 27; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-40

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-34

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 23; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-35.
Hearing on recount or protest — Notice — Declaration of nomination or election.

Immediately upon the filing of a protest or request, the state board shall cause notice in writing to be served in any manner that it directs, at the expense of the petitioner, upon all other candidates of the same political party for the same office receiving votes at the primary, and shall give notice in some public newspaper of general circulation in the voting district or districts where the primary took place of the making of the request or protest and the time and place of the hearing, which time shall be not less than one nor more than three (3) weekdays after the publication of the notice. At the hearing all candidates who may be affected by a recount may be heard in person or by their representative. The hearing and the examination of the voting equipment or the recounting of the ballots, as the case may be, as may be necessary, shall be conducted in a summary and expeditious manner, but the result of the voting as determined by the state board shall not be altered or changed by the board except upon satisfactory proof of its incorrectness. Following the hearing, the state board shall declare what person, if any, was lawfully nominated or elected, and shall issue or direct the local board to issue a certificate of the nomination or election to that person.

Recounts shall be conducted in the manner set forth in chapter 19 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 27; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-41

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-35

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10.

17-15-36.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 28; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-42

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-36

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 191, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 7, 2007.

17-15-37.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 28; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-43

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-37

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 191, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 7, 2007.

17-15-38.
Vacancies among nominees.

Whenever the nominee of a party for a particular office dies after the primary, or removes him or herself from the jurisdiction of or as a candidate for the office for which the nominee seeks election, or becomes physically or mentally disabled, the state committee of that party or a duly authorized subcommittee of the state committee in the case of state officers, and the appropriate city, town, ward, or district committee or any duly authorized subcommittee of them in the case of candidates for the other offices covered by §

17-15-7

, may file with the appropriate authority the name of its nominee for the office; provided, that except in the case of death, the appropriate committee shall file the name with the appropriate authority no later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. of the third (3rd) day following the last day for the holding of the party primaries; and provided, further, that any appointed nominee shall have been eligible for the nomination on the dates as required by and pursuant to the requirements of §§

17-14-1.1

,

17-14-2

, and

17-14-2.1

. The person so named shall be the nominee of the party for the office, and if in case of the death of a nominee time will permit, the secretary of state shall place the name of the nominee upon the election ballot. When the withdrawal or death occurs after the third (3rd) day after the last day for holding primaries, the secretary of state shall not be required to remove from any computer ballot or mail ballot which has already been printed the name of any person who is no longer the nominee of a party for a particular office as provided in this subsection, and any votes cast in any election for that person shall not be counted.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit the state committee of the party, or a duly authorized subcommittee of the state committee in the case of state officers, or the appropriate city, town, ward, or district committee or any duly authorized subcommittee of them in the case of candidates for the other offices covered by §

17-15-7

, to file the name of a nominee for a vacant office if the vacancy is the result of the failure of candidate(s) of the party to qualify for the public office through the timely filing of sufficient nomination papers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 29; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2941, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-44

; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-38

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 243, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 10; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 76; P.L. 1990, ch. 395, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 10; P.L. 1997, ch. 363, § 2.

17-15-39.
Preservation of primary records.

All declarations of candidacy, nomination papers, and all requests for withdrawal of names of candidates, whether before or after the holding of a primary, when filed, and all protests and requests for recounts, shall be open, under proper regulation, to public inspection, and the state board shall preserve these records in its office not less than twenty-six (26) calendar months from the date of filing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 30; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-45; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-39

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 10.

17-15-40.
Right to nominate by petition preserved.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, this chapter shall not be construed to prevent the nominations of candidates by individual voters in accordance with the provisions of chapter 16 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 32; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-46; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-40

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-41.
School committee caucuses unaffected.

All nonpartisan school district caucuses, specially provided for by statute, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to exempt any caucuses for nomination of members of school committees from the provisions of chapter 19 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 34; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-47; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-41

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 76.

17-15-42.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 35; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-48; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-42

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 8; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 10; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 76; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 147, § 1, effective June 16, 1991.

17-15-43.
Applicability of election law.

All political party primaries shall be construed to be “elections” as defined in this title, and all the provisions of this title shall, insofar as consistent with the provisions of this chapter, apply to all political party primaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 36; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-49; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-43

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-15-44.
Rules — Recommendations for amendment of laws.

The state board shall have power to make any rules that it deems designed to promote the objects and purposes of chapters 12 — 15 of this title, and shall annually report to the general assembly, in writing, the amendments it recommends should be made to these chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 38; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-15-50; G.L. 1956, §

17-15-44

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.